Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 3. VITAL STATISTICS

CHAPTER 195. ENFORCEMENT OF VITAL STATISTICS REPORTING

Sec. 195.001. ENFORCEMENT OF TITLE; REPORTS BY LOCAL REGISTRAR. (a) The local registrar in each local registration district shall enforce this title under the supervision and direction of the state registrar.

(b) A local registrar shall report immediately to the state registrar a violation of this title of which the local registrar has knowledge by observation, by complaint of another person, or by other means.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 195.002. SUPERVISION AND INVESTIGATION BY STATE REGISTRAR. (a) The state registrar shall execute this title throughout the state. To ensure uniform compliance with this title, the state registrar has supervisory power over local registrars, deputy registrars, and subregistrars.

(b) The state registrar or the state registrar's representative may investigate cases of irregularity or violations of law. On request, any other registrar shall aid in the investigation.

(c) If the state registrar considers it necessary, the state registrar shall report a violation of this title to the appropriate district or county attorney for prosecution. The report must include a statement of the facts and circumstances. The district or county attorney shall immediately initiate and promptly follow up the necessary court proceedings against the person or corporation responsible for the alleged violation.

(d) On the request of the state registrar, the attorney general shall assist in enforcing this title.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 195.003. FALSE RECORDS. (a) A person commits an offense if the person intentionally or knowingly makes a false statement or directs another person to make a false statement in:

(1) a certificate, record, or report required under this title;

(2) an application for an amendment of a certificate, record, or report required under this title;

(3) an application for a delayed birth certificate or delayed death certificate; or

(4) an application for a certified copy of a vital record.

(b) A person commits an offense if the person intentionally or knowingly supplies false information, or intentionally or knowingly creates a false record, or directs another person to supply false information or create a false record, for use in the preparation of a certificate, record, report, or amendment under this title.

(c) A person commits an offense if the person, without lawful authority and with intent to deceive, makes, counterfeits, alters, amends, or mutilates or directs another person to make, counterfeit, alter, amend, or mutilate:

(1) a certificate, record, or report required under this title; or

(2) a certified copy of a certificate, record, or report required under this title.

(d) A person commits an offense if the person, for purposes of deception, intentionally or knowingly obtains, possesses, uses, sells, or furnishes, or attempts or directs another person to attempt to obtain, possess, use, sell, or furnish a certificate, record, or report required under this title, or a certified copy of a certificate, record, or report required under this title, if the document:

(1) is made, counterfeited, altered, amended, or mutilated without lawful authority and with intent to deceive;

(2) is false in whole or in part; or

(3) relates to the birth of another individual.

(e) A person commits an offense if the person intentionally or knowingly fraudulently identifies himself or herself to obtain or return registration forms, certificates, or any other forms required under this title.

(f) An offense under this section is a felony of the third degree.

(g) In this section, "person" means an individual, corporation, or association.

(h) If a person is convicted of an offense under this section, the court shall order as a condition of probation that the person cannot obtain a certificate, record, or report to which this section applies or practice midwifery, and the Texas Department of Criminal Justice shall require as a condition of parole that the person cannot obtain a certificate, record, or report to which this section applies or practice midwifery.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 15, Sec. 5.15, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 195.004. FAILURE TO PERFORM DUTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person refuses or fails to furnish correctly any information in the person's possession affecting a certificate or record required under this title.

(b) A person commits an offense if the person fails, neglects, or refuses to fill out a birth or death certificate and to file the certificate with the local registrar or deliver it on request to the person with the duty to file it, as required by this title.

(c) A local registrar, deputy registrar, or subregistrar commits an offense if that person fails, neglects, or refuses to perform a duty under this title or under instructions and directions of the state registrar given under this title.

(d) Except as provided by Subsection (d-1), an offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

(d-1) An offense under this section for failure to perform a duty required by Section 192.003 is a Class A misdemeanor.

(e) In this section, "person" means an individual, corporation, or association.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 222 (H.B. 253), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 195.005. DISCLOSURE OF CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION. (a) A person commits an offense if the person knowingly violates Section 192.002(b), knowingly induces or causes another to violate that section, or knowingly fails to comply with a rule adopted under that section.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 14, Sec. 62, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.